California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 and the rate of reimbursement that shall be paid to the department shall be at the amount set by the department for the fiscal year commencing July 1 of that year. The department shall provide a mechanism for formal agreement of bed levels no later than June 15 of each year. However, after July 1 the department and a county or group of counties may enter into a contract pursuant to this chapter and the contract shall govern the number of state hospital beds and rates of reimbursement for the fiscal year commencing July 1 of that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 114.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4332.

(a) Contracts entered into pursuant to Section 4331 shall do all of the following:

(1) Specify the number of beds to be provided.

(2) Specify the rate or rates of reimbursement.

(3) Set forth the specific type of services requested by the county, in detail.

(4) Specify procedures for admission and discharge.

(5) Include any other pertinent terms as agreed to by the department and the county.

(b) The department shall consult, in advance, with the counties regarding any changes in state hospital facilities or operations which would significantly impact access to care or quality of care, or significantly increase costs.

(c) The department shall make available to counties upon request the basis upon which its rates have been set, including any indirect cost allocation formulas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 115.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4333.

(a) In the event a county or counties elect to reduce their state hospital resources, beginning July 1, 1992, systemwide state hospital net bed reduction in any one year may not exceed 10 percent of the total for patients under Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 in the prior year without the specific approval of the Director of State Hospitals.

(b) Net bed reductions at any one hospital may not exceed 10 percent of its contracted beds without specific approval of the Director of State Hospitals.

(c) If the proposed reduction in any year exceeds the maximum permitted amount, the department, with the assistance of counties, shall make every effort to contract for beds with other
 purchasers.

(d) If total county requests for bed reduction in any one year or at any one facility still exceed the amount of reduction allowed, each county’s share of the reduction shall be determined by taking the ratio of its contracted beds to the total contracted and multiplying this by the total beds permitted to be reduced.

(e) (1) Small counties shall be exempted from the limitations of this section and shall have the amount of their reduction determined by the Director of State Hospitals.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, “small counties” means counties with a population of 125,000 or less based on the most recent available estimates of population data determined by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that counties have maximum flexibility in planning the use of these resources, which includes making full use of existing facilities and that the Director of State Hospitals enforce their exemption authority in a manner consistent with this intent. Because freed-up beds may be purchased by other counties or may be used for other purposes, it is anticipated that individual county flexibility will be substantially greater than the 10-percent figure described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(g) Counties may annually contract for state hospital beds as single entities or in combination with other counties. For purposes of this section, small counties, as defined in subdivision (e):

(1) Are encouraged to establish regional authorities to pool their resources to assure their ability to provide the necessary array of services to their
 mentally ill populations not otherwise available to them on an individual basis.

(2) May receive loans from the General Fund when emergency state hospital beds are needed, not to exceed one year in duration, with interest payable at the same rate as that earned through the Pooled Money Investment Fund. Any interest due may be waived based upon a finding of emergency by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services and the Director of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 141.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4333.5.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals shall encourage the counties to use state hospital facilities, in addition to utilizing state hospital beds pursuant to contract, for additional treatment programs through contracts, on either an individual county or regional basis.

(b) For purposes of contracts entered into through encouragement provided by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), costs shall be based on the actual costs to the state, and shall be prorated on an annual lease basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 117.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4334.

The State Department of State Hospitals, in collaboration with counties, shall do all of the following:

(a) Prepare and publish a catalogue of available state hospital services. The catalogue shall be updated annually.

(b) Develop a process by which a county or group of counties constituting the primary user of a particular hospital may, upon their request individually, or through selected representatives, participate in long-range planning and program development to ensure the provision of appropriate services.

(c) Ensure direct county involvement in admission to, and
 discharge from, beds contracted for patients under Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 118.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4335.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to prevent the department from entering into innovative arrangements with counties for delivery of state hospital services. The Director of State Hospitals may contract with a county, or group of counties, for excess state hospital space for purposes of staffing and operating their own program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 119.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4335.2.

(a) As used in this section, “department” means the State Department of State Hospitals.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of this section is to establish a program for the department to perform reevaluations primarily through telehealth evaluations for felony incompetent to stand trial (IST) individuals in jail who have been waiting for admission to the department. The goals of this program are:

(1) To permit the department to conduct reevaluations of IST defendants committed to the department and awaiting admission to department facilities.

(2) To reduce the growing list of IST defendants awaiting placement to
 a department facility for competency restoration treatment.

(3) To help address the significant impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic on the IST waitlist through identification of individuals on the waitlist who have restored to competency in jail, are nonrestorable, are malingering, may be divertible, or have stabilized and are appropriate for outpatient treatment.

(4) To reduce the timeframe for a competency evaluation for IST defendants in jail and reduce unnecessary costly hospitalizations.

(5) To offer expert forensic mental health consultation to assist in identifying ISTs who may be appropriate for community placement. This supports the principles of deinstitutionalization for individuals who can best be supported in the least restrictive setting in the community.

(6) To offer expert medication consultation and technical assistance to local sheriffs to support effective use of psychotropic medications and stabilization of IST defendants awaiting placement to a department facility.

(7) To require courts and local county jails to provide to the department all relevant medical, behavioral, and court records of IST defendants committed to the department for evaluation purposes.

(8) To require local county jails to provide the department access to IST defendants in county jails and for local county jails to ensure the department the ability to provide reevaluations for IST defendants remotely.

(9) To require local county jails to allow the department access to necessary IST defendants’ information, including records and collateral information.

(c) The department, or its designee, have the authority and sole discretion to consider and conduct reevaluations for IST defendants committed to and awaiting admission to the department. A reevaluation shall involve a review by a department clinician or contracted clinician of an IST defendant’s relevant medical and mental health records, including prior mental health evaluations and an evaluation of the IST defendant by that department clinician or contracted clinician. When conducting the reevaluation, the department or its designee may request defendant’s counsel to provide any information bearing on the defendant’s capacity to rationally cooperate in their defense that is absent from the records accessible to the court. Defense counsel may provide a written statement of their reasoning for questioning the defendant’s mental competence and the time of their most recent contact with the defendant. Any communication between the defendant’s
 counsel and the evaluator is confidential pursuant to Section 954 of the Evidence Code. If not already provided, the court shall provide the department with all IST defendant records pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, including any updated medical and behavioral health records requested by the department. At the sole discretion of the department, the department clinician or contracted clinician may conduct in person, or video telehealth, evaluations of IST defendants at the local jail for those IST patients awaiting admission to the department. The local jail shall provide the department confidential access to the IST defendant for reevaluation, including establishing and maintaining remote access capabilities at the jail for the department to remotely access the IST defendant.

(d) Reevaluations provided by the department clinician or contracted clinician shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Evaluations, including assessment of malingering, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372 of the Penal Code.

(2) Assessments to determine whether the IST defendant should be referred to the county for further evaluation for potential participation in the county diversion program, if one exists, pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code, or other outpatient treatment program.

(3) Evaluations on whether the IST defendant is substantially unlikely to be restored to competence in the foreseeable future pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code or subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code. Evaluations shall include, if applicable, facts supporting that a defendant appears gravely disabled as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008, which a court may utilize to order a conservatorship investigator to initiate conservatorship proceedings pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code.

(4) Psychopharmacology evaluations in which a department clinician will identify IST defendants who may need psychotropic medications, a psychopharmacology consultation, or an involuntary medication order.

(5) A written report from the department clinician or contracted clinician of their evaluations of the IST defendant, as well as any conclusions of mental health status and recommendations the clinician may have of placement of the IST defendant.

(e) A court may issue an order authorizing involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code. The court shall base its determination on the recommendation made by a department clinician pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d). If a hearing is ordered by the court pursuant to subparagraph (C) or (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, the clinician shall be
 allowed to testify remotely. In-person witness testimony shall only be allowed upon a court’s finding of good cause.

(f) Written reports shall be filed with the court in the committing county. That report shall be accepted by courts, either pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372 of the Penal Code.

(g) The department shall provide funding based on a flat rate set by the department to local county jails for reimbursement of information technology support and a portion of staff time utilized to facilitate telehealth interviews and evaluations of felony IST defendants in the jail. One-time funding based on a flat rate set by the department will be made available for reimbursement to the county sheriff upon agreement to facilitate telehealth
 evaluations in the jail. In addition, a flat rate, set by the department, for reimbursement of each telehealth evaluation conducted by the department for an IST defendant and facilitated by the jail will be paid on a quarterly basis in arrears following conclusion of the telehealth evaluation.

(h) Any contracts awarded to implement this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual and shall not be subject to approval by the Department of General Services.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the state hospitals and the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other similar instruction, as necessary.

(j) The department and any of the designated evaluators shall be provided access to the defendant’s medical records, including mental health records for purposes of conducting a reevaluation of the competency status of the defendant.

(k) The department and any of the designated evaluators shall, upon request, be provided prompt and unimpeded collateral consult with local county jail staff, including contractors, for the purpose of determining an IST defendant’s behavior, care, progress, and treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 12.   (AB 204)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4336.

(a) As used in this section, “department” means the State Department of State Hospitals.

(b) (1) The department shall implement a growth cap program for all counties for individuals committed pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code. The department shall charge counties penalty payments as described in this subdivision to implement the growth cap program.

(2) The baseline number of individuals determined to be incompetent to stand trial on felony charges for each county shall be the number of felony incompetency determinations made in the 2021–22 fiscal year for each county. For any county with zero felony
 incompetency to stand trial determinations in the 2021–22 fiscal year, the baseline shall be set at one individual.

(3) (A) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, for each felony incompetent to stand trial determination that exceeds the baseline number identified in paragraph (2), a county shall pay the penalty amount described in subparagraph (C).

(B) The department shall reconcile the total county incompetent to stand trial determinations against the baseline by September 30 each year.

(C) Calculations shall be based on the published per individual rate set forth by the department for state hospital treatment for individuals found incompetent to stand trial on a
 felony charge, as follows:

(i) Each county shall make penalty payments equivalent to 50 percent of the rate for the 5th, 6th, and 7th individual felony incompetent to stand trial determinations over the baseline, 75 percent of the rate for the 8th and 9th individual felony incompetent to stand trial determinations over the baseline, and 100 percent of the rate for the 10th and all subsequent felony incompetent to stand trial determinations over the baseline.

(ii) (I) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a county with a felony mental health diversion or community-based restoration contract with the department shall, for the third and any subsequent individual felony incompetent to stand trial determinations over the
 baseline, make penalty payments equivalent to 100 percent of the rate.

(II) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, any county without a felony mental health diversion or community-based restoration contract with the department shall, for the third and any subsequent individual felony incompetent to stand trial determinations over the baseline, make penalty payments equivalent to 150 percent of the rate.

(D) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the department shall periodically notify the superior court and relevant county agencies of each county, including, but not limited to, the county administrator, behavioral health department, sheriff, public defender, and district attorney of the total number of felony incompetent to stand trial
 determinations made in that county for the current fiscal year compared to the baseline determination for that county.

(E) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, each county shall remit payment to the department in an amount equal to the amount identified in the invoice issued to the county administrator or their designee by the department. The penalty payment shall be due no later than 90 days after the date that the invoice is received by the county. The penalty funds shall be collected as revenue by the department and deposited by the Controller into the Mental Health Diversion Fund, created pursuant to subdivision (c).

(F) A county may pay these penalty payments from any local funding source available, including funds received by the county through contracts issued by the
 department to the county for purposes of serving the felony incompetent to stand trial population.

(G) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, notwithstanding any other budgetary or accounting requirements, the department shall make the final determination of the proper budgeting and accounting of the penalties received, deposited, and disbursed from the Mental Health Diversion Fund to each county as appropriate.

(c) (1) The Mental Health Diversion Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The fund shall receive penalty payments from each county as collected by the department pursuant to this section. All moneys in the fund are reserved and continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years. The funds collected
 in the fund shall be used for the purpose of supporting county activities that will divert individuals with serious mental illnesses away from the criminal justice system and lead to the reduction of felony incompetent to stand trial determinations.

(2) Activities supported by the funds collected in the Mental Health Diversion Fund shall include one or more of the following:

(A) Prebooking mental health diversion to serve those with serious mental illness and prevent their felony arrest. The target population that shall be served are individuals demonstrating psychosis manifesting as hallucinations, delusions, disorganized thoughts, or disorganized behavior at the time of the interaction.

(B) Postbooking mental health
 diversion to serve those with serious mental illness and who are likely to be found incompetent to stand trial, to prevent the incompetent to stand trial determination and divert the individual from incarceration. The target population that shall be served are individuals diagnosed with a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, including, but not limited to, bipolar disorder, schizophrenia, and schizoaffective disorder but excluding a primary diagnosis of antisocial personality disorder, borderline personality disorder, and pedophilia, and who are presenting non-substance-induced psychotic symptoms.

(C) Reentry services and support to serve those who have been restored to competency following a felony incompetent to stand trial commitment and directly released to
 the community from jail.

(d) (1) Beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year, each county that has received funds from the Mental Health Diversion Fund shall submit an annual report to the department, on or before October 1 of each fiscal year, identifying how funds were used in the prior fiscal year.

(2) The department shall, by no later than July 1, 2024, publish an administrative letter to counties outlining the required form and content of the report.

(3) Annual reports submitted by each county subject to this section shall include, without limitation, the number of individuals served, the services and support provided, and the projected impact to the number of felony incompetent to stand trial
 determinations by the county.

(e) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall submit a schedule to the Controller of disbursements of funds from the Mental Health Diversion Fund to each county. Disbursements for each county shall equal the amount of county payments made to the department in accordance with subdivision (b).

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a departmental letter or other similar instruction, as necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 28.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. DEPARTMENTAL PROGRAM INITIATIVES [4340. - 4369.4.]



  CHAPTER 1. Self-Help Programs [4340. - 4340.]

4340.

The State Department of Health Care Services may maintain a statewide mental health prevention program directed toward a reduction in the need for utilization of the treatment system and the development and strengthening of community support and self-help networks. The State Department of State Hospitals may support the establishment of self-help groups, which may be facilitated by an outside
 entity, subject to the approval of the hospital administrator, at state hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 72.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Human Resource Development [4341. - 4341.5.]

4341.

(a) To ensure the availability of an adequate number of persons from all disciplines necessary to implement appropriate and effective services to a person with a serious mental health condition, of any age and from any ethnic group, the department shall, to the extent resources are available, implement a Human Resources Development Program.

(b) Implementation of the program shall include negotiation with any or all of the following: the University of California, state colleges, community colleges, private universities and colleges, public and private hospitals, and public and private rehabilitation, community care, treatment providers, and
 professional associations, to arrange affiliations and contracts for educational and training programs to ensure appropriate numbers of graduates with experience in serving persons with a serious mental health condition in the most cost-effective programs.

(c) The human resources development effort shall be undertaken with active participation of the California Conference of Local Mental Health Directors, client and family representatives, and professional and academic institutions.

(d) The program shall give particular attention to areas of specific expertise where local programs and state hospitals have difficulty recruiting qualified staff, including programs for children and youth with forensic persistent and severe mental health conditions and elderly persons with
 serious mental health conditions. Specific attention shall be given to ensuring the development of a mental health work force with the necessary bilingual and bicultural skills to deliver effective service to the diverse population of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 9.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4341.5.

In order to ensure an adequate number of qualified psychiatrists and psychologists with forensic skills, the State Department of State Hospitals shall, to the extent resources are available, plan with the University of California, private universities, and the California Postsecondary Education Commission, for the development of programs for the training of psychiatrists and psychologists with forensic skills, and recommend appropriate incentive measures, such as state scholarships.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 120.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Primary Intervention Program [4343. - 4352.5.]

4343.

The Legislature recognizes that prevention and early intervention services have long been slighted in the community mental health programs and has identified, as a goal of the Bronzan-McCorquodale program, the prevention of serious mental disorders and psychological problems. It is the intent of the Legislature to establish throughout the state a school-based primary intervention program designed for the early detection and prevention of emotional, behavioral, and learning problems in primary grade children with services provided by child aides or unpaid volunteers under the supervision of mental health professionals. The Legislature recognizes the documented significant improvement of children who have participated in the program over time. The goal of the primary intervention program is to help young children derive maximum profit from the school experience and, in so doing, prevent later-life problems of school failure, unemployment, delinquency, criminal behavior, and substance abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4344.

Primary intervention programs shall be developed in accordance with the guidelines and principles set forth in this chapter. To this end, school districts, publicly funded preschool programs, and local mental health programs may implement primary intervention programs with available funds, or may jointly apply to the State Department of Mental Health to be considered for grant programs outlined in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 3.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4345.

The Director of Mental Health shall develop guidelines for primary intervention programs in accordance with the following:

(a) School-based programs shall serve children in grades kindergarten through three. 

(b) The programs may serve children beyond grade three who could benefit from the program but the number of children accepted into the program from grades four and above shall not represent more than 15 percent of the total number of children served. 

(c) The programs may serve children enrolled in a publicly funded preschool program. 

(d) The programs shall serve children referred by either a screening process, a teacher, school-based mental health professionals, other school personnel who have had opportunities to observe children in interpersonal contacts, or parents. If a screening process is utilized, behavior rating scales shall constitute the primary instrument from which referrals to primary intervention programs are made. To a more limited extent, observations of children working on structured tasks and standardized projective tests may also be used. 

(e) The programs may include a parent involvement component. 

(f) Before acceptance of a child into a primary intervention program, parental consent is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 4.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4346.

(a) Each primary intervention program shall have a core team consisting of school-based mental health professionals, including credentialed school psychologists, school counselors, school social workers, or local mental health program professionals, or a combination thereof, and child aides.

(b) The school-based mental health professionals shall be responsible for accepting referred children into the program, supervision of the child aides, assignment of a child to an aide, evaluation of progress, and determination of termination from the program. The mental health professionals shall supervise the scoring and interpretation of screening and assessment test data, conduct conferences with parents, and evaluate the effectiveness of individual aides.

(c) Child aides, under supervision of the school-based mental health professional, shall conduct weekly play sessions with children served in the primary intervention programs. Child aides may be salaried school aides, unpaid volunteers or other persons with time and interest in working with young children, and who may be provided stipends to meet expenses.

(d) All aides shall undergo a time-limited period of training that is focused on the main intervention strategies of the particular program and is provided prior to direct contacts with the children served in the primary intervention programs. Training shall, at a minimum, include basic child development, crisis intervention, techniques of nondirective play, other intervention skills appropriate to identified problem areas, and instruction in utilizing supervision and consultation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 18.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4347.

School districts or publicly funded preschools receiving funds under this chapter shall demonstrate a capability for referral to appropriate public and private community services. The referrals shall be made through contacts with families in response to information regarding the need for referral arising from the child aide sessions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 6.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4348.

(a) (1) Subject to the availability of funding each year, the State Department of Mental Health shall award primary intervention program grants pursuant to a request for proposal consistent with the provisions of this chapter. 

(2) In counties over 100,000 in population, each application shall be the product of a proposal developed jointly between the local mental health program and a school district or publicly funded preschool. The grant award shall be administered by the local mental health program. 

(3) In counties 100,000 in population and under, an application may be submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) or by the county superintendent of schools on behalf of one or more school districts, or by a school district. If an application is submitted by the county superintendent of schools or by a school district, the county office of education or the school district shall administer the grant and the application shall include evidence satisfactory to the department that adequate mental health training and consultation will be provided at each program site.

(b) Prior to dissemination of a request for proposal, the department shall establish a maximum figure for the amount of program funds available per project site and for the number of sites that may be funded per school district or regional area. The department shall be guided in its decisions by the availability of uncommitted funds designated for the primary intervention program. 

(c) Primary intervention program grants shall be funded from funds appropriated for programs pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 4370) and shall receive first priority for these funds.

(d) Upon approving a primary intervention grant, the State Department of Mental Health shall contract with the grant recipient to provide a primary intervention program for a period of up to three years.

(e) Costs of a primary intervention program shall be financed on a basis of:

(1) A maximum of 50 percent from primary intervention program grant funds or a maximum established by the department, whichever is less. 

(2) At least 50 percent from a combination of school district or preschool and local mental health program funds. 

(f) The school district or preschool share may be in-kind contributions, including staff, space, equipment, materials, and reasonable administrative services. 

(1) Contributed space to be used for child aide sessions must be comfortable, attractive, and engaging to young children. Small individual rooms are preferable. 

(2) Space to be used for group meetings and consultation sessions may also be contributed. 

(3) Equipment and materials may be contributed if they include items that encourage child participation in nondirective play.

(g) The local mental health program share may include either the cost of the mental health professionals as described in subdivision (b) of Section 4346 or the contribution of professional staff to provide case consultation to the child aides and assistance in child aide training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 19.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4349.

The State Department of Mental Health shall, on the basis of applications submitted pursuant to a request for proposal, select recipients of primary intervention program grants based on the following criteria:

(a) Availability of professional and other program staff with related experience and interest in early intervention. 

(b) Reasonable evidence of future stability of the program and its personnel. 

(c) Representation of a wide range of economic, ethnic, and cultural populations. 

(d) Demonstration of strong support by the teaching, pupil services, and administrative personnel at the school or preschool and by the local mental health program. 

(e) Assurance that grants would supplement existing local resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 8.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4349.5.

Grants that have been awarded prior to the effective date of this section shall continue to be subject to the provisions of this chapter, including the grant recipient, matching, and eligibility requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 20.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4349.7.

Proposals submitted to the department between April 1, 1992, and May 1, 1992, pursuant to Sections 4343 to 4350, inclusive, that received a passing score shall be funded pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 4370). Those grants shall continue to be subject to this chapter, including the matching and eligibility requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 21.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4350.

(a) The role of the school district or preschool in each approved primary intervention program shall be to do all of the following: 

(1) Arrange for mental health professionals based at the program site to supervise program staff and procedures. These persons may be either pupil personnel staff or local mental health program staff. 

(2) Recruit and train child aides. 

(3) Screen and assess children in accordance with guidelines established by the department. 

(4) Provide individual and group play sessions to selected children in accordance with guidelines established by the department. 

(5) Provide space and equipment for child aide sessions with children and for staff meetings. 

(6) Establish and maintain program records. 

(7) Prepare program reports in accordance with guidelines established by the department. 

(8) Submit periodic statements of program grant fund expenditures to the local mental health program for reimbursement in accordance with the approved program budget. 

(b) The role of the local mental health program in each approved jointly proposed primary intervention program shall be to: 

(1) Administer state program grant funds awarded by the department by contracting with the school district or preschool to provide a primary intervention program in accordance with this chapter and the joint proposal of the local mental health program and the school district or preschool as approved by the department. 

(2) Contribute professional staff to the program to do both of the following: 

(A) Assist the school district or preschool in the recruiting and initial training of child aides. 

(B) Provide ongoing case consultation and training to the child aides at regular intervals at the program site. 

(3) Ensure access to appropriate mental health treatment services available within the county’s program for those children in the program and their families who require services that are beyond the scope and purposes of the primary intervention program. 

(c) The role of the State Department of Mental Health in each approved primary intervention program shall be to: 

(1) (A) Develop a contract with the local mental health program for provision of a primary intervention program in accordance with this chapter and the joint proposal of the local mental health program and school district or preschool as approved by the department. 

(B) Develop contracts with the county superintendent of schools or a school district for provision of a primary intervention program in accordance with this chapter and the proposal submitted by the county superintendent of schools or a school district pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4348. 

(2) Develop contracts with school districts or local mental health programs to permit the establishment of technical assistance centers to support in the timely and effective implementation of the primary intervention programs. Technical assistance centers shall be in districts which have successfully implemented programs over a period of time. 

(3) Disburse program grant funds to the local mental health program or county superintendent of schools or school district in accordance with terms of the contract. 

(4) Conduct visits to each program site at least once during the first year of funding, and thereafter as necessary, in order to determine compliance with this chapter and the contract and to determine training needs of program staff. 

(5) Provide for periodic training workshops for program staff. 

(6) Establish guidelines for program procedures, screening and assessment of children, records, and reports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 858, Sec. 9.   Effective October 14, 1991.)